Wisconsin, session 2025, AB909.
do enact as follows:AB909,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB909,2,22(1) Enterprise-wide data and efficiency study.AB909,2,63(a) Data and efficiency study steering committee. There is created a joint 4legislative committee to be known as the data efficiency study steering committee. 5The committee shall consist of the following members appointed to serve at the 6pleasure of the appointing authority:AB909,2,871. One representative to the assembly appointed by the speaker of the 8assembly.AB909,3,212. One representative to the assembly appointed by the assembly minority 2leader.AB909,3,333. One senator appointed by the president of the senate.AB909,3,444. One senator appointed by the senate minority leader.AB909,3,655. A representative of the department of revenue appointed by the secretary of 6revenue.AB909,3,876. A representative of the department of administration appointed by the 8secretary of administration.AB909,3,199(b) Study. The data efficiency study steering committee shall contract with a 10nonstate, qualified, and experienced firm to conduct a comprehensive study of 11interagency data sharing practices within state government. The contracted firm 12shall bring an independent perspective to current data and analytical activities in 13state government and shall make recommendations concerning how the state can 14most cost-effectively and efficiently implement changes available through new 15technology. The steering committee shall coordinate with state agencies to carry 16out the study and shall obtain input from relevant nonstate stakeholders. Each 17state agency shall cooperate with the steering committee and the contracted firm 18for purposes of the study. In conducting the study, the contracted firm shall do all of 19the following at the direction of the steering committee:AB909,3,22201. Assess existing statutory, regulatory, and governance frameworks that 21shape data sharing and data management across state agencies, with attention to 22opportunities for greater standardization.AB909,3,24232. Identify technical, legal, and organizational barriers that limit consistent, 24enterprise‑wide data sharing and collaboration.AB909,4,213. Review best practices from other states to understand effective models for 2enterprise-wide data and analytics environments.AB909,4,534. Identify high‑value data and analytics interagency use cases that would 4benefit from a standardized, statewide approach to data management and analytics 5delivery.AB909,4,965. Recommend organizational structures and actionable steps to establish or 7enhance a consistent enterprise-wide data and analytics framework, including 8options such as establishing an enterprise-wide data and analytics office or 9designating a chief data officer in state government.AB909,4,13106. Evaluate strategies to improve efficiency and readiness, such as leveraging 11shared platforms, consolidating technologies, and considering external 12enterprise‑wide data and analytics or data warehousing solutions capable of 13supporting a standardized statewide environment.AB909,4,15147. Evaluate the possibility of establishing a template and standard design for 15state agencies’ consumer facing websites.AB909,4,2216(c) Report. No later than December 31, 2026, the data efficiency study 17steering committee shall submit a report of the contracted firm’s findings and 18recommendations from the study conducted under par. (a) to the appropriate 19standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3). The report shall include 20proposed legislative or administrative actions necessary to implement the steering 21committee’s and contracted firm’s recommendations, including organizational and 22funding measures.AB909,5,223(d) Dissolution of the steering committee. Once the data efficiency study 1steering committee submits the report under par. (c), the steering committee shall 2wrap up its business and dissolve.AB909,5,33